Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska21-164
Direct action by member.

(RULLCA 901) (a) Subject
to subsection (b) of this section, a member may maintain a direct action against
another member, a manager, or the limited liability company to enforce the
member's rights and otherwise protect the member's interests, including rights
and interests under the operating agreement or the Nebraska Uniform Limited
Liability Company Act or arising independently of the membership relationship.

(b) A member maintaining
a direct action under this section must plead and prove an actual or threatened
injury that is not solely the result of an injury suffered or threatened to
be suffered by the limited liability company.

Laws 2010, LB888, § 64.

A member of a limited liability company may file a direct action against only the limited liability company itself, its manager, or another member. Klingelhoefer v. Parker, Grossart, 20 Neb. App. 825, 834 N.W.2d 249 (2013).